Maryland, session 2025, HB0649.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Family Law
5–525.3.
(A) BEFORE A FOSTER PARENT MAY CONSENT TO THE PLACEMENT OF A
CHILD WITH THE FOSTER PARENT, A CHILD PLACEMENT AGENCY SHALL PROVIDE A
REPORT OF THE CHILD’S BACKGROUND TO THE FOSTER PARENT.
(B) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INDICATE WHETHER THE CHILD HAS:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0649*

HOUSE BILL 649
(1) HAD ANY INTERACTION WITH A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY, AS
DEFINED IN § 5–701 OF THIS TITLE, INCLUDING ANY ARRESTS;
(2) BEEN CHARGED WITH OR FOUND GUILTY OF A CRIME;
(3) BEEN A MEMBER OF OR ASSOCIATED WITH A CRIMINAL GANG; OR
(4) BEEN SUSPENDED OR EXPELLED FROM SCHOOL.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.